North Carolina statutes. Chapter 113B. North Carolina Energy Policy Act of 1975.
Article 2. Energy Crisis Administration.

§ 113B-20.
Definition; declaration of energy crisis.

“Energy crisis”. — An energy crisis exists when the health, welfare or safety of the citizens of North Carolina are threatened by reason of an actual or impending acute shortage in usable, necessary energy resources.

Declaration by Governor. — Upon a finding by the Governor that the conditions stated in subsection (a) do exist, the Governor may declare the existence of an energy crisis.

History.

1975, c. 877, s. 4.

§ 113B-21.
Creation of Legislative Committee on Energy Crisis Management.

Upon the declaration of an energy crisis by the Governor, a Legislative Committee on Energy Crisis Management shall be created to consist of the Speaker, the Speaker Pro Tempore of the House of Representatives, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the majority leader of the Senate. The Lieutenant Governor shall serve as chair and shall be a nonvoting ex officio member, provided, however, that the chair shall vote to break a tie.

The Legislative Committee shall convene within 24 hours following the declaration of an energy crisis, as provided in

G.S. 113B-20

.

Members of the Legislative Committee shall be reimbursed for their services pursuant to the provisions of

G.S. 138-5

.

History.

1975, c. 877, s. 4; 1977, c. 23, s. 1; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 135; 2013-365, s. 8(j).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-365, s. 8(j), effective July 29, 2013, in subsection (a), substituted “Upon the declaration of an energy crisis by the Governor” for “There is hereby created,” “Pro Tempore” and “Pro Tempore of the Senate” for “pro tempore,” and “the chair” for “he,” added “shall be created” and “chair and shall be,” and deleted “as chairman” following “of the Speaker” and “and” following “Representatives.”

§ 113B-22.
Procedures for adopting emergency proposals; emergency powers.

Upon the declaration of an energy crisis, the Governor shall submit to the Legislative Committee for its prompt consideration such emergency orders, rules and regulations as deemed necessary to alleviate the effects of the energy crisis.

The Governor shall immediately consult with the Legislative Committee about the emergency proposals. The emergency orders, rules, or regulations shall become effective at a time specified by the Governor, but no earlier than 48 hours after submission to the Legislative Committee, provided that they may take effect at an earlier time if approved by a majority vote of the Council of State after the Council makes a finding that the crisis is of such immediacy as to make delay for legislative review cause for probable harm to the public.

No order, rule, or regulation promulgated under the provisions of this section shall remain in effect for more than 30 days unless the Governor consults with the Legislative Committee. Such consultation is separate and apart from the consultation required by subsection (a) of this section, and may not take place until the order, rule, or regulation has been in effect for at least seven days.

The Governor’s orders, rules and regulations, promulgated, subject to consultation with the Legislative Committee, pursuant to this section, may also include, by way of further enumerated example rather than limitation, provisions for the establishment and implementation of programs, controls, standards, priorities, and quotas for the allocation, conservation and consumption of energy resources; the suspension and modification of existing standards and requirements affecting or affected by the use of energy resources, including those relating to air quality control and the hours and days during which public buildings may or may not be required to remain open; and the establishment and implementation of regional programs and agreements for the purposes of coordinating the energy resource programs and actions of the State with those of the federal government and of other states and localities.

History.

1975, c. 877, s. 4; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, ss. 136, 137.

§ 113B-23.
Administration of plans and procedures.

Upon the declaration of an energy crisis, pursuant to

G.S. 113B-20

, the Energy Policy Council shall become the emergency energy coordinating body for the State and shall carry out the following duties:

Identify and determine the nature and severity of expected energy shortages;

Provide for daily communications with and gather information from significant energy producers, distributors, transporters and major consumers, as determined by the Energy Policy Council, to carry out its responsibilities pursuant to this section;

Provide data, carry out continuing assessments of the crisis situation, and make recommendations to the Governor and to the Legislative Committee on Energy Crisis Management for further action.

Upon the declaration of an energy crisis, the Governor shall order the Energy Policy Council, the Utilities Commission, the Attorney General and other appropriate State and local agencies to implement and enforce the Emergency Energy Program pursuant to

G.S. 113B-9

and any emergency rules, orders or regulations approved pursuant to

G.S. 113B-22

.

Upon the declaration of an energy crisis, the Governor may employ such measures and give such direction to State and local offices and agencies as may be reasonable and necessary for the purpose of securing compliance with the provisions of this Article and with emergency rules, orders and regulations issued pursuant to

G.S. 113B-22

.

History.

1975, c. 877, s. 4; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 138; 2013-365, s. 8(k).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-365, s. 8(k), effective July 29, 2013, added “on Energy Crisis Management” in subdivision (a)(3).

§ 113B-24.
Enforcement; penalties for violations.

The Attorney General and the law-enforcement authorities of the State and its political subdivisions shall enforce the provisions of this Article and all orders, rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to

G.S. 113B-22

.

Any person who violates this Article or any rules, orders or regulations promulgated pursuant to

G.S. 113B-22

or knowingly or willfully submits false information in any report required herein shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

The provisions of this Article or any rules, orders or regulations promulgated pursuant to

G.S. 113B-22

may be enforced by bringing an action to enjoin such acts or practices as may be in violation and, upon a proper showing, a temporary restraining order or a preliminary or permanent injunction shall be issued. The relief sought may include a mandatory injunction commanding any person to comply with any such order, rule or regulation and restitution of money received in violation of any such order, rule or regulation. The Attorney General shall bring any action under this subsection upon the request of the Governor, the Legislative Committee on Energy Crisis Management, the Energy Policy Council, or upon his direction if he deems such action advisable and in the public interest. The Attorney General may institute such action in the Superior Court of Wake County, or, in his discretion, in the superior court of the county in which the acts or practices constituting a violation occurred, are occurring or may occur.

History.

1975, c. 877, s. 4; 1993, c. 539, s. 878; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).